North Carolina, session 2025, SB468.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-87 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-87. Passenger vehicle registration fees.
These fees shall be paid to the Division annually for the registration and licensing of
passenger vehicles, according to the following classifications and schedules:
…
(13) Additional fee for certain electric vehicles. – At Except as provided in
subdivision (13b) of this section, at the time of an initial registration or
registration renewal, the owner of a plug-in electric vehicle that is not a
low-speed vehicle and that does not rely on a nonelectric source of power shall
pay a fee in the amount of one hundred eighty dollars ($180.00) in addition to
any other required registration fees.
(13a) Additional fee for plug-in hybrid vehicles. – At Except as provided in
subdivision (13b) of this section, at the time of an initial registration or
registration renewal, the owner of a plug-in hybrid vehicle shall pay a fee in
the amount of ninety dollars ($90.00) in addition to any other required
registration fees.
(13b) Alternative additional fee. – At the option of the owner, the additional fee for
an electric vehicle in subdivision (13) of this section and a plug-in hybrid
vehicle in subdivision (13a) of this section may be satisfied by payment of a
mileage fee that is based upon the number of miles driven since the previous
registration of the vehicle.
…."
SECTION 2. The Division of Motor Vehicles shall adopt rules to implement
G.S. 20-87(13b) as enacted by Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to electric and
plug-in hybrid vehicles registered on or after October 1, 2025.
*S468-v-1*